Delaware, session 153, HB123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Part E, Subchapter VII, Chapter 5 of Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1460A. Discharging a firearm at a dwelling, place of worship, vehicle, or place of business. (a) It is unlawful to knowingly or intentionally discharge a firearm at any of the following: (1) A dwelling. (2) A place of worship. (3) A vehicle. (4) A place of business. (b) For purposes of this section: (1) âDwellingâ means as defined in Â§ 829 of this title. (2) âPlace of businessâ means a permanent physical structure that is marked with signage and within which a commercial, service, or other legal enterprise is operated. âPlace of businessâ does not include a shooting range or other business the purpose of which is to provide a venue for lawful firearm practice or other lawful firearm uses. (c) A violation of this section is a class E felony. (d) A person may not be convicted of both a violation of this section and reckless endangering in the first degree, or both a violation of this section and reckless endangering in the second degree, with regard to the same conduct.